Tennessee, session 114, HB2292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-6-139, is amended by designating
subsection (a) as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following new subdivision (a)(2):
(2) Upon posting a disciplinary action under subdivision (a)(1), the board shall
notify the department of commerce and insurance of the disciplinary action as soon as
practicable.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2292
011887
- 1 -